Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4936.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement
shall remove Karen K. Kiley as the surviving spouse beneficiary of retired state trooper Dale R.
Kiley’s retirement pension benefits pursuant to option (c) of subdivision (2) of section 12 of
chapter 32 of the General Laws. The state board of retirement shall make Dale R. Kiley the sole
beneficiary of his retirement pension benefits, as provided for under option (a) of said
subdivision (2) of said section 12 of said chapter 32.
of 1